dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="Schal__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Past/a__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>a</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>a</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>a</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>a</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>as</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>as</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>as</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>as</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>en</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>en</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>en</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>en</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ranch__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>es</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>es</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>es</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>es</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Getreide__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>sorten</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>sorten</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>sorten</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>sorten</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Weizen__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>sorten</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>sorten</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>sorten</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>sorten</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="L/ager__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>ager</l>    <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>agers</l>   <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ager</l>    <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ager</l>    <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ager</l>    <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ager</l>    <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>agern</l>   <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ager</l>    <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>äger</l>    <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>äger</l>    <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>ägern</l>   <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>äger</l>    <r>ager<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Felsen__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Algebra"><i>Algebr</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ära"><i>Är</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Arena"><i>Aren</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Armada"><i>Armad</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Aufwärtshaken"><i>Aufwärtshaken</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Augentropfen"><i>Augentropfen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Aula"><i>Aul</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Autoreifen"><i>Autoreifen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ballen"><i>Ballen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Barren"><i>Barren</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Basilika"><i>Basilik</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Besen"><i>Besen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Billardliga"><i>Billardlig</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Brocken"><i>Brocken</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bummel"><i>Bummel</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Daumen"><i>Daumen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dienstagmorgen"><i>Dienstagmorgen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Diva"><i>Div</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Donnerstagmorgen"><i>Donnerstagmorgen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Drachen"><i>Drachen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Einkaufsbummel"><i>Einkaufsbummel</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fahrradreifen"><i>Fahrradreifen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fauna"><i>Faun</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Felsen"><i>Felsen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ferienlager"><i>Ferienl</i><par n="L/ager__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fetzen"><i>Fetzen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Firma"><i>Firm</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Flecken"><i>Flecken</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Franken"><i>Franken</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Freitagmorgen"><i>Freitagmorgen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Galgen"><i>Galgen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gemüse"><i>Gemüse</i><par n="Getreide__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Groschen"><i>Groschen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Haufen"><i>Haufen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Hintern"><i>Hintern</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Husten"><i>Husten</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Junta"><i>Junt</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Käsekuchen"><i>Käsekuchen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Knochen"><i>Knochen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Lager"><i>L</i><par n="L/ager__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Leisten"><i>Leisten</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Liga"><i>Lig</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Mensa"><i>Mens</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Montagmorgen"><i>Montagmorgen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Nacken"><i>Nacken</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Pasta"><i>Past</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Peseta"><i>Peset</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Pfosten"><i>Pfosten</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Pizza"><i>Pizz</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Rachen"><i>Rachen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ranch"><i>Ranch</i><par n="Ranch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Rasen"><i>Rasen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Razzia"><i>Razzi</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Regentropfen"><i>Regentropfen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Riemen"><i>Riemen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Samen"><i>Samen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sauna"><i>Saun</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schal"><i>Schal</i><par n="Schal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schaufensterbummel"><i>Schaufensterbummel</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schlitten"><i>Schlitten</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schoppen"><i>Schoppen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Segelregatta"><i>Segelregatt</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Segen"><i>Segen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Skala"><i>Skal</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sommerferienlager"><i>Sommerferienl</i><par n="L/ager__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Spaten"><i>Spaten</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Streifen"><i>Streifen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tombola"><i>Tombol</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tropfen"><i>Tropfen</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tuba"><i>Tub</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Veranda"><i>Verand</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Villa"><i>Vill</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Viola"><i>Viol</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Weizen"><i>Weizen</i><par n="Weizen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Western"><i>Western</i><par n="Felsen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zahnpasta"><i>Zahnpast</i><par n="Past/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zucker"><i>Zucker</i><par n="Weizen__n"/></e>
